Utah statutes.
7-2-9.   Conservatorship, receivership, or liquidation of institution --
Appointment of receiver -- Review of actions.
(1)  Upon taking possession of the institution, the commissioner may appoint a
receiver to perform the duties of the commissioner.  Subject to any
limitations, conditions, or requirements specified by the commissioner and
approved by the court, a receiver shall have all the powers and duties of the
commissioner under this chapter and the laws of this state to act as a
conservator, receiver, or liquidator of the institution.  Actions of the
commissioner in appointing a receiver shall be subject to review only as
provided in Section 7-2-2.
(2) (a)  If the deposits of the institution are to any extent insured by a
federal deposit insurance agency, the commissioner may appoint that agency as
receiver.  After receiving notice in writing of the acceptance of the
appointment, the commissioner shall file a certificate of appointment in the
commissioner's office and with the clerk of the district court.  After the
filing of the certificate, the possession of all assets, business, and
property of the institution is considered transferred from the institution and
the commissioner to the agency, and title to all assets, business, and
property of the institution is vested in the agency without the execution of
any instruments of conveyance, assignment, transfer, or endorsement.
(b)  If a federal deposit insurance agency accepts an appointment as receiver,
it has all the powers and privileges provided by the laws of this state and
the United States with respect to the conservatorship, receivership, or
liquidation  of an institution and the rights of its depositors, and other
creditors, including authority to make an agreement for the purchase of assets
and assumption of deposit and other liabilities by another depository
institution or take other action authorized by Title 12 of the United States
Code to maintain the stability of the banking system.  Such action by a
federal deposit insurance agency may be taken upon approval by the court, with
or without prior notice.  Such actions or agreements may be disapproved,
amended, or rescinded only upon a finding by the court that the decisions or
actions of the receiver are arbitrary, capricious, fraudulent, or contrary to
law.  In the event of any conflict between state and federal law, including
provisions for adjudicating claims against the institution or receiver, the
receiver shall comply with the federal law and any resulting violation of
state law shall not by itself constitute grounds for the court to disapprove
the actions of the receiver or impose any penalty for such violation.
(c)  The commissioner or any receiver appointed by him shall possess all the
rights and claims of the institution against any person whose breach of
fiduciary duty or violations of the laws of this state or the United States
applicable to depository institutions may have caused or contributed to a
condition which resulted in any loss incurred by the institution or to its
assets in the possession of the commissioner or receiver.  As used in this
Subsection (2)(c), fiduciary duty includes those duties and standards
applicable under statutes and laws of this state and the United States to a
director, officer, or other party employed by or rendering professional
services to a depository institution whose deposits are insured by a federal
deposit insurance agency.  Upon taking possession of an institution, no person
other than the commissioner or receiver shall have standing to assert any such
right or claim of the institution, including its depositors, creditors, or
shareholders unless the right or claim has been abandoned by the commissioner
or receiver with approval of the court.  Any judgment based on the rights and
claims of the commissioner or receiver shall have priority in payment from the
assets of the judgment debtors.
(d)  For the purposes of this section, the term "federal deposit insurance
agency" shall include the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National
Credit Union Administration and any departments thereof or successors thereto,
and any other federal agency authorized by federal law to act as a
conservator, receiver, and liquidator of a federally insured depository
institution, including the Resolution Trust Corporation and any department
thereof or successor thereto.
(3)  The receiver may employ assistants, agents, accountants, and legal
counsel.  If the receiver is not a federal deposit insurance agency, the
compensation to be paid such assistants, agents, accountants, and legal
counsel shall be approved by the commissioner.  All expenses incident to the
receivership shall be paid out of the assets of the institution.  If a
receiver is not a federal deposit insurance agency, the receiver and any
assistants and agents shall provide bond or other security  specified by the
commissioner and approved by the court for the faithful discharge of all
duties and responsibilities in connection with the receivership including the
accounting for money received and paid.  The cost of the bond shall be paid
from the assets of the institution.  Suit may be maintained on the bond by the
commissioner or by any person injured by a breach of the condition of the
bond.
(4) (a)  Upon the appointment of a receiver for an institution in possession
pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner and the department are exempt from
liability or damages for any act or omission of any receiver appointed
pursuant to this section.
(b)  This section does not limit the right of the commissioner to prescribe
and enforce rules regulating a  receiver in carrying out its duties with
respect to an institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department.
(c)  Any act or omission of the commissioner or of any federal deposit
insurance agency as a receiver appointed by him while acting pursuant to this
chapter shall be deemed to be the exercise of a discretionary function within
the meaning of Section 63G-7-301 of the laws of this state or Section 28
U.S.C. 2680(a) of the laws of the United States.
(5)  Actions, decisions, or agreements of a receiver under this chapter, other
than allowance or disallowance of claims under Section 7-2-6, shall be subject
to judicial review only as follows:
(a)  A petition for review shall be filed with the court having jurisdiction
under Section 7-2-2 not more than 90 days after the date the act, decision, or
agreement became effective or its terms are filed with the court.
(b)  The petition shall state in simple, concise, and direct terms the facts
and principles of law upon which the petitioner claims the act, decision, or
agreement of the receiver was or would be arbitrary, capricious, fraudulent,
or contrary to law and how the petitioner is or may be damaged thereby.  The
court shall dismiss any petition which fails to allege that the petitioner
would be directly injured or damaged by the act, decision, or agreement which
is the subject of the petition.  Rule 11 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure
shall apply to all parties with respect to the allegations set forth in a
petition or response.
(c)  The receiver shall have 30 days after service of the petition within
which to respond.
(d)  All further proceedings are to be conducted in accordance with the Utah
Rules of Civil Procedure.
(6)  All notices required under this section shall be made in accordance with
the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and served upon the attorney general of the
state of Utah, the commissioner of financial institutions, the receiver of the
institution appointed under this chapter, and upon the designated
representative of any party in interest who requests in writing such notice.
